District of Columbia statutes.
8-1421

Findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

A terrorist attack on a large-quantity hazardous material shipment near the United States Capitol (“Capitol”) would be expected to cause tens of thousands of deaths and a catastrophic economic impact of $5 billion or more.

(2)

The threat of terrorism facing District of Columbia residents and workers in the vicinity of the Capitol requires an urgent response that recognizes and addresses the unique status of this area in American politics and history, and the risk of terrorism that results from this status.

(3)

While the federal government has occupied the field of en route security and routing in the aviation context, it has not addressed the subject of rail car routing for security purposes. Moreover, the federal government has not acted to address the terrorist threat resulting from the transportation of ultra-hazardous materials within 2 miles of the Capitol, the White House, and the United States Supreme Court, unique terrorist targets.

(4)

Shippers of ultra-hazardous materials do not need to route large quantities of ultra-hazardous chemicals near the Capitol in order to ship these chemicals to their destinations, and alternative routes would substantially decrease the aggregate risk posed by terrorist attacks.

(5)

Requiring permits for ultra-hazardous shipments from a Capitol Exclusion Zone that encompasses all points within 2.2 miles of the Capitol would impose no significant burden on interstate commerce.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-80, § 2, 53 DCR 1047
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Temporary Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-2, May 14, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5425).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-43, February 15, 2005, 52 DCR 3048).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-90, June 1, 2005, 52 DCR 5428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Second Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-236, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 245).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-325, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2576).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 to the Director of the District of Columbia Department of Transportation, see Mayor’s Order 2005-34, February 22, 2005 ( 52 DCR 2856).
Amendment of Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Terrorism Prevention in Hazardous Materials Transportation Emergency Act of 2005 to the Director of the District of Columbia Department of Transportation, see Mayor’s Order 2005-74, May 5, 2005 ( 52 DCR 5503).